lexc/adj/enhuadjfnmn.lexc
! enhuadjfnmn.lexc
Multichar_Symbols [stem]  +Adj @U.ART.PRESENT@ @U.ART.ABSENT@ 

+Dis +Ess +Soc +Tem +Pref+
+Posss1s +Posss2s +Posss3s +Possp1s +Possp2s +Possp3s 
+Posss1p +Posss2p +Posss3p +Possp1p +Possp2p +Possp3p

+Plur +Fam +Gens +Genpl
      
+Abl +Acc +Ade +All +Cau +Dat +Del
+Ela +Fac +For +Forp +Forpen +Ill +Ine +Ins +Nom
+Sub +Sup +Ter  +Mid

+Ik
      
§EOA§ §uue§ §ooez3§ §OEOE1§ §J§ §UUE§ §OEOE§ §JP§ §AE§ §OEOE2§
§UUE1§ §oeoez1§ §oooe§ §oeoez2§ §AAA§ §oeoe§ §AA§ §oeoez§ §AE1§ §oeoezmid§ §oeoez12e§ §Jnull§ §JJ§ §JPnull§ §JPJ§
§VV§ §b§ §h§ §k§ §n§ §r§ §t§ §oeoebb§ 
§OEOE4a§ §oeoez11§ 
§oeoez1e§ §oeoez11e§ §oeoeadjoe§ §oeoezoe§


LEXICON Root
   Prefleg ;

LEXICON Prefleg
leg@U.ART.PRESENT@       Adj ; ! optional article prefix
leg@U.ART.PRESENT@       Prefnum; ! optional article prefix
leg@U.ART.PRESENT@       Prefigekoto; ! optional article prefix
legesleg@U.ART.PRESENT@       Adj ; ! optional article prefix
legesleg@U.ART.PRESENT@       Prefnum; ! optional article prefix
legesleg@U.ART.PRESENT@       Prefigekoto; ! optional article prefix
                        Adj ; ! empty string entry
                        Prefnum; ! empty string entry
                        Prefigekoto; ! empty string entry


LEXICON Prefigekoto
+Pref+:keresztül   Adj3igek;
+Pref+:kölcsön   Adj3igek;
+Pref+:széjjel   Adj3igek;
+Pref+:szembe   Adj3igek;
+Pref+:szerte   Adj3igek;
+Pref+:vissza   Adj3igek;
+Pref+:helyre   Adj3igek;
+Pref+:tovább   Adj3igek;
+Pref+:tönkre   Adj3igek;
+Pref+:észre   Adj3igek;
+Pref+:rajta   Adj3igek;
+Pref+:előre   Adj3igek;
+Pref+:félbe   Adj3igek;
+Pref+:félre   Adj3igek;
+Pref+:felül   Adj3igek;
+Pref+:fölül   Adj3igek;
+Pref+:agyon   Adj3igek;
+Pref+:ellen   Adj3igek;
+Pref+:körbe   Adj3igek;
+Pref+:körül   Adj3igek;
+Pref+:közbe   Adj3igek;
+Pref+:közre   Adj3igek;
+Pref+:külön   Adj3igek;
+Pref+:utána   Adj3igek;
+Pref+:végbe   Adj3igek;
+Pref+:végig   Adj3igek;
+Pref+:hátra   Adj3igek;
+Pref+:hozzá   Adj3igek;
+Pref+:egybe   Adj3igek;
+Pref+:ketté   Adj3igek;
+Pref+:össze   Adj3igek;
+Pref+:mellé   Adj3igek;
+Pref+:által   Adj3igek;
+Pref+:alul   Adj3igek;
+Pref+:haza   Adj3igek;
+Pref+:újra   Adj3igek;
+Pref+:abba   Adj3igek;
+Pref+:neki   Adj3igek;
+Pref+:bele   Adj3igek;
+Pref+:újjá   Adj3igek;
+Pref+:benn   Adj3igek;
+Pref+:fenn   Adj3igek;
+Pref+:fönn   Adj3igek;
+Pref+:jóvá   Adj3igek;
+Pref+:szét   Adj3igek;
+Pref+:tele   Adj3igek;
+Pref+:tova   Adj3igek;
+Pref+:meg   Adj3igek;
+Pref+:oda   Adj3igek;
+Pref+:elő   Adj3igek;
+Pref+:túl   Adj3igek;
+Pref+:alá   Adj3igek;
+Pref+:föl   Adj3igek;
+Pref+:ide   Adj3igek;
+Pref+:fel   Adj3igek;
+Pref+:rá   Adj3igek;
+Pref+:ki   Adj3igek;
+Pref+:le   Adj3igek;
+Pref+:el   Adj3igek;
+Pref+:át   Adj3igek;
+Pref+:be   Adj3igek;
            Adj3igek;

LEXICON Prefnum
+Pref+:sok       Adj2num; ! optional article prefix
+Pref+:több       Adj2num; ! optional article prefix
+Pref+:fél       Adj2num; ! optional article prefix
+Pref+:harmad       Adj2num; ! optional article prefix
+Pref+:negyed       Adj2num; ! optional article prefix
+Pref+:ötöd       Adj2num; ! optional article prefix
+Pref+:hatod       Adj2num; ! optional article prefix
+Pref+:heted       Adj2num; ! optional article prefix
+Pref+:nyolcad       Adj2num; ! optional article prefix
+Pref+:kilenced       Adj2num; ! optional article prefix
+Pref+:tized       Adj2num; ! optional article prefix
+Pref+:huszad       Adj2num; ! optional article prefix
+Pref+:század       Adj2num; ! optional article prefix
+Pref+:ezred       Adj2num; ! optional article prefix
+Pref+:egy       Adj2num; ! optional article prefix
+Pref+:két       Adj2num; ! optional article prefix
+Pref+:három       Adj2num; ! optional article prefix
+Pref+:négy       Adj2num; ! optional article prefix
+Pref+:öt       Adj2num; ! optional article prefix
+Pref+:hat       Adj2num; ! optional article prefix
+Pref+:hét       Adj2num; ! optional article prefix
+Pref+:nyolc       Adj2num; ! optional article prefix
+Pref+:kilenc       Adj2num; ! optional article prefix
+Pref+:tíz       Adj2num; ! optional article prefix
+Pref+:tizenegy       Adj2num; ! optional article prefix
+Pref+:tizenkét       Adj2num; ! optional article prefix
+Pref+:tizenhárom       Adj2num; ! optional article prefix
+Pref+:tizennégy       Adj2num; ! optional article prefix
+Pref+:tizenöt       Adj2num; ! optional article prefix
+Pref+:tizenhat       Adj2num; ! optional article prefix
+Pref+:tizenhét       Adj2num; ! optional article prefix
+Pref+:tizennyolc       Adj2num; ! optional article prefix
+Pref+:tizenkilenc       Adj2num; ! optional article prefix
+Pref+:húsz       Adj2num; ! optional article prefix
+Pref+:harminc       Adj2num; ! optional article prefix
+Pref+:negyven       Adj2num; ! optional article prefix
+Pref+:ötven       Adj2num; ! optional article prefix
+Pref+:hatvan       Adj2num; ! optional article prefix
+Pref+:hetven       Adj2num; ! optional article prefix
+Pref+:nyolcvan       Adj2num; ! optional article prefix
+Pref+:kilencven       Adj2num; ! optional article prefix
+Pref+:száz       Adj2num; ! optional article prefix
+Pref+:ezer       Adj2num; ! optional article prefix
+Pref+:millió       Adj2num; ! optional article prefix
+Pref+:billió       Adj2num; ! optional article prefix
+Pref+:trillió       Adj2num; ! optional article prefix
+Pref+:milliárd       Adj2num; ! optional article prefix
+Pref+:billiárd       Adj2num; ! optional article prefix
                        Adj2num; ! empty string entry

LEXICON AddAdjeEnd
0:szerű AddAdjszeru;
0:féle AddAdj; 
0:fajta AddAdj; 

LEXICON AddAdjeEndat
0:szerű AddAdjszeru;
0:féle AddAdj; 
0:fajta AddAdj; 
0:0 AddAdjat;

LEXICON AddAdjeEndnyi
0:szerű AddAdjszeru;
0:féle AddAdj; 
0:fajta AddAdj; 
0:nyi AddAdji; 
0:i AddAdji; 

LEXICON AddAdjeEndnyiat
0:szerű AddAdjszeru;
0:féle AddAdj; 
0:fajta AddAdj; 
0:nyi AddAdji; 
0:i AddAdji; 
0:0 AddAdjat;

! al only with these
LEXICON AddAdjszeru
0:^+cMid§oeoebb§bb Tocase1;  !körkörösebbek nem körkörösebbök!
@U.ART.ABSENT@  Tocaseszeru;

Lexicon Tocaseszeru
[stem]+Adj:0     Possszeru;
[stem]+Adj:0     Plurszeru;
[stem]+Adj:0     Famszeru;

LEXICON Plurszeru
+Plur:^+cPlur^e§oeoez1§k    Genszeru;
+Plur:^+cPlur^e§oeoez11§k    Genszeru;
+Plur:^+cPlur^e§oeoez11e§k    Genszeru;
+Plur:^+cPlur^§oeoez1§k    Genszeru;
+Plur:^+cPlur^§oeoez11§k    Genszeru;
+Plur:^+cPlur^§oeoez11e§k    Genszeru;
                            Genszeru;

LEXICON Famszeru
+Fam:^+cFam^ék         Genszeru;
                       Genszeru;

LEXICON Possszeru
+Dis:^+cDis^§ooez3§nként    #;    ! anként, enként
+Soc:^+cSoc^§EOA§st§uue§l   #;    ! astul, estül
+Tem:^+cTem^§k§or             #;    ! kor
+Posss1s:^+cPosss1s^§OEOE1§m   Famszeru;   ! m
+Posss1s:^+cPosss1s^§OEOE4a§m   Famszeru;   ! m
+Posss2s:^+cPosss2s^§OEOE1§d   Famszeru;   ! d
+Posss2s:^+cPosss2s^§OEOE4a§d   Famszeru;   ! d
+Posss3s:^+cPosss3s^§J§§AE1§   Famszeru;   ! ja, je, a,e
+Possp1s:^+cPossp1s^§UUE§nk   Famszeru;   ! unk, ünk
+Possp2s:^+cPossp2s^§OEOE1§t§OEOE§k   Famszeru;   ! etek, atok
+Possp2s:^+cPossp2s^§OEOE4a§t§OEOE§k   Famszeru;   ! etek, atok
+Possp3s:^+cPossp3s^§J§§UUE1§k   Famszeru;   ! ük, uk
+Posss1p:^+cPosss1p^§JP§§AE§im   Famszeru;   ! aim
+Posss2p:^+cPosss2p^§JP§§AE§id   Famszeru;   ! aid
+Posss3p:^+cPosss3p^§JP§§AE§i   Famszeru;   ! ai, jai, ei, jei
+Possp1p:^+cPossp1p^§JP§§AE§ink   Famszeru;   ! aink, eink
+Possp2p:^+cPossp2p^§JP§§AE§it§OEOE2§k   Famszeru;  ! aitok, eitek
+Possp3p:^+cPossp3p^§JP§§AE§ik   Famszeru;   !aik, jaik, eik, jeik
                           Famszeru;


LEXICON Genszeru
+Gens:^+cGens^é          Caseszeru;
+Genpl:^+cGenpl^éi     Caseszeru;
                       Caseszeru;

LEXICON Adj2num
centes AddAdjeEndat;
csövűsítés AddAdjeEndat;
dolláros AddAdjeEndat;
ezerforintos AddAdjeEndat;
ezerrubeles AddAdjeEndat;
ezerschillinges AddAdjeEndat;
ezerzłotys AddAdjeEndat;
filléres AddAdjeEndat;
fontos AddAdjeEndat;
forintos AddAdjeEndat;
kerék-hajtás AddAdjeEndat;
kerék-meghajtás AddAdjeEndat;
márkás AddAdjeEndat;
negyedesítés AddAdjeEndat;
pennys AddAdjeEndat;
pólus AddAdjeEndat;
rubeles AddAdjeEndat;
szerezés AddAdjeEndat;
százdolláros AddAdjeEndat;
százeurósszerű AddAdjszeru;
százfontos AddAdjeEndat;
százforintos AddAdjeEndat;
százmárkás AddAdjeEndat;
százrubeles AddAdjeEndat;
százschillinges AddAdjeEndat;
százzłotys AddAdjeEndat;
színnyomás AddAdjeEndat;
szögelés AddAdjeEndat;
szögesítés AddAdjeEndat;
szögletesedés AddAdjeEndat;
tusázás AddAdjeEndat;
złotys AddAdjeEndat;
LEXICON Adj3igek
adódó AddAdjeEndat;
anyagiasulás AddAdjeEnd;
bodrozódás AddAdjeEnd;
békülékenyítő AddAdjeEndnyi;
börtönzés AddAdjeEndnyiat;
bújtatás AddAdjeEnd;
cseperedés AddAdjeEndnyi;
csucsorító AddAdjeEnd;
definitívedés AddAdjeEndnyi;
dinasztikusító AddAdjeEnd;
dörzsölés AddAdjeEndnyiat;
dürögés AddAdjeEndnyi;
előkészületlenítő AddAdjeEndnyi;
emanáló AddAdjeEnd;
emésztés AddAdjeEndnyiat;
eszközölő AddAdjeEndnyi;
esés AddAdjeEndnyiat;
fenegyerekeskedés AddAdjeEndnyi;
fenés AddAdjeEndnyiat;
fertőzés AddAdjeEndnyiat;
fésülő AddAdjeEndnyi;
fülgyulladás AddAdjeEnd;
gyepűzés AddAdjeEndnyi;
győzés AddAdjeEndnyiat;
hangelnyelő AddAdjeEndnyi;
hervasztató AddAdjeEnd;
hírközlés AddAdjeEndnyi;
hűtés AddAdjeEndnyiat;
ismeretesítő AddAdjeEndnyi;
jelenés AddAdjeEndnyiat;
jogbitorlás AddAdjeEnd;
keményszívűsítő AddAdjeEndnyi;
kenés AddAdjeEndnyiat;
kezdés AddAdjeEndnyiat;
konzervkészítés AddAdjeEndnyi;
kovásító AddAdjeEnd;
kézöblítő AddAdjeEndnyi;
közönyösödő AddAdjeEndnyi;
légneműsítő AddAdjeEndnyi;
lépés AddAdjeEndnyiat;
machináló AddAdjeEnd;
meszező AddAdjeEndnyi;
metszés AddAdjeEndnyiat;
mérés AddAdjeEndnyiat;
nemvizesítés AddAdjeEndnyi;
nyaggató AddAdjeEnd;
oldalfelező AddAdjeEndnyi;
pogánylázadás AddAdjeEnd;
prüsszentés AddAdjeEndnyi;
rebbenés AddAdjeEndnyiat;
rendőrködés AddAdjeEndnyi;
rezzenés AddAdjeEndnyiat;
rojtosítás AddAdjeEnd;
röhögő AddAdjeEndnyi;
stílszerűtlenítés AddAdjeEndnyi;
szappanosító AddAdjeEnd;
szerzés AddAdjeEndnyiat;
szélesztetés AddAdjeEndnyi;
tamponozás AddAdjeEnd;
terjengősülő AddAdjeEndnyi;
tűnődés AddAdjeEndnyi;
ultizó AddAdjeEnd;
zsémbeskedés AddAdjeEndnyi;
zsírosodó AddAdjeEnd;
értés AddAdjeEndnyiat;
ömlengő AddAdjeEndnyi;
LEXICON Adj
aldrovanda AddAdjeEnd;
anziksszerű AddAdjszeru;
appendicitis AddAdjeEndnyi;
asztaldísszerű AddAdjszeru;
barlangászat AddAdjeEnd;
benti AddAdjszeru;
bicepsszerű AddAdjszeru;
bővítmény AddAdjeEnd;
chipsszerű AddAdjszeru;
csipkedísszerű AddAdjszeru;
csizmafej AddAdjeEndnyi;
dentális AddAdjeEnd;
dropsszerű AddAdjszeru;
dísszerű AddAdjszeru;
ellenvoksszerű AddAdjszeru;
elővigyázat AddAdjeEnd;
expressz-szerű AddAdjszeru;
ezermagtömeg AddAdjeEndnyi;
fentebbi AddAdjszeru;
flint AddAdjeEnd;
földönkívüli AddAdjszeru;
fönti AddAdjszeru;
geszt AddAdjeEnd;
gipsszerű AddAdjszeru;
gyapjúszövet AddAdjeEndnyi;
harács AddAdjeEnd;
hexensussz-szerű AddAdjszeru;
hullámhossz-szerű AddAdjszeru;
hüvelyes AddAdjeEndnyi;
idefenti AddAdjszeru;
idekinti AddAdjszeru;
igealak AddAdjeEnd;
iksszerű AddAdjszeru;
jövőbeni AddAdjszeru;
kandúrmacska AddAdjeEnd;
kaszafenés AddAdjeEndnyiat;
keksszerű AddAdjszeru;
kifőzdés  AddAdjeEndat;
klipsszerű AddAdjszeru;
kompenzáció AddAdjeEnd;
kotlett AddAdjeEndnyi;
krikszkraksszerű AddAdjszeru;
könnyzacskó AddAdjeEnd;
küklopsszerű AddAdjszeru;
lenti AddAdjszeru;
lépfenés AddAdjeEndnyiat;
lövölde AddAdjeEnd;
lúdfű AddAdjeEndnyi;
m-edszeri AddAdjszeru;
melldísszerű AddAdjszeru;
moréna AddAdjeEnd;
motokrossz-szerű AddAdjszeru;
mögötti AddAdjszeru;
nyeldesés AddAdjeEndnyi;
nyomortanya AddAdjeEnd;
odafenti AddAdjszeru;
odakinti AddAdjszeru;
penicilus AddAdjeEnd;
petrolkoksszerű AddAdjszeru;
párkány AddAdjeEnd;
rangjelző AddAdjeEndnyi;
rassz-szerű AddAdjszeru;
rákfenés AddAdjeEndnyiat;
rózsadísszerű AddAdjszeru;
rövidnadrág AddAdjeEnd;
snassz-szerű AddAdjszeru;
suviksszerű AddAdjszeru;
szerecsen AddAdjeEnd;
szubrett AddAdjeEndnyi;
síszerű AddAdjszeru;
sítalpazás AddAdjeEnd;
treonin AddAdjeEnd;
távmérés AddAdjeEndnyi;
többi AddAdjszeru;
verbunk AddAdjeEnd;
voksszerű AddAdjszeru;
zöldhagyma AddAdjeEnd;
zörej AddAdjeEndnyi;
állat-egészségügyi AddAdjszeru;
üledékvíz AddAdjeEnd;
